District of Columbia statutes.
29-403.04

Ultra vires.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the validity of corporate action shall not be challenged on the ground that the nonprofit corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

(b)

The power of a nonprofit corporation to act may be challenged in a proceeding by:

(1)

A member, director, or member of a designated body against the corporation to enjoin the act;

(2)

The corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director or member of a designated body, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation; or

(3)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia under § 29-412.20.

(c)

In a derivative proceeding under subchapter XI of this chapter by a member, director, or member of a designated body under subsection (b)(1) of this section to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, the Superior Court may enjoin or set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss, other than anticipated profits, suffered by the corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720